Utah statutes.
26-20-3.   False statement or representation relating to medical benefits.

(1) A person shall not make or cause to be made a false statement or false representation of a material fact in an application for medical benefits.

(2)  A person shall not make or cause to be made a false statement or false representation of a material fact for use in determining rights to a medical benefit.

(3)  A person, who having knowledge of the occurrence of an event affecting his initial or continued right to receive a medical benefit or the initial or continued right of any other person on whose behalf he has applied for or is receiving a medical benefit, shall not conceal or fail to disclose that event with intent to obtain a medical benefit to which the person or any other person is not entitled or in an amount greater than that to which the person or any other person is entitled. 

